District of Columbia statutes.
46-357.09

Partial enforcement.

If a tribunal of the District does not recognize and enforce a Convention support order in its entirety, it shall enforce any severable part of the order. An application or direct request may seek recognition and partial enforcement of a Convention support order.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 709, 63 DCR 222